Louisiana, session 2026, SB423.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:332.2(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§332.2. Disposition of certain collections in East Baton Rouge Parish
* * *
B. The monies in the East Baton Rouge Parish Riverside Centroplex Fund
shall be subject to an annual appropriation by the legislature. The monies in the fund
shall be available for capital improvements and operations at the Riverside
Centroplex, the Louisiana Arts Art and Science Center Museum, Riverfront
Promenade, and related projects in the Riverfront Development Plan, all such
projects to be in the city of Baton Rouge. All unexpended and unencumbered monies
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-834 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 423
in the fund shall remain in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested by the
treasurer in the same manner as the monies in the state general fund, and all interest
earned shall be deposited into the state general fund.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.